Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-214.01
Manufacturer, defined.

(1) Manufacturer shall mean any person who assembles, produces, makes, or prints any bingo equipment.

(2) Manufacturer shall not mean or include a licensed distributor who places, finishes, or configures disposable paper bingo cards, which have been produced by a licensed manufacturer, into a looseleaf or book form or some other format for distribution to an organization licensed to conduct bingo.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 18;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 6.